Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202179-3202
Seizure action plan, defined.

For purposes of the Seizure Safe Schools Act, seizure action plan means a written, individualized health plan designed to acknowledge and prepare for the health care needs of a student diagnosed with a seizure disorder.

Laws 2021, LB639, § 2.